

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version












 



Action Alignment, LLC Employee Discounts, Employee Benefits, Employee Perks, Employee Discount Program - Corporate Shopping

















Exclusive Offers. Elite Brands. Easy Shopping.



GO 




FOLLOW US: 


login








Action Alignment, LLC


Enjoy Private Employee Discounts, Exclusive Pricing and Friends & Family Sales.

























- REAL RECENT OFFERS -





Special employee pricing, everyday discounts,
		private offers, Friends & Family, and more!



You're in good company! All Action Alignment, LLC employees are eligible for unbeatable deals at over 250 of the world's best retailers.
Lifetime registration is 100% free to all employees.

FIRST NAME:LAST NAME:EMAIL:CREATE PASSWORD:RE-TYPE PASSWORD:*ALTERNATE EMAIL:Instant Access!
We absolutely respect email privacy. Privacy Policy










Top Companies Eligible For Employee Discounts

ADP, Inc.
Advanced Auto
AIG
Albertsons
Ally Financial Inc.
American Family Insurance Company
Arby's
AT&T Corporation
Avaya Inc.
Amazon.com, Inc.
Amgen Inc.
Apple Inc.
Avis Budget Group, Inc.
3M Company
Abbott Laboratories
Advanced Micro Devices, Inc.
Aecom Technology Corporation
Agilent Technologies, Inc.
American International Group, Inc.
AOL Inc.
Ashland Inc.
Assurant, Inc.
Autoliv, Inc.
Avery Dennison Corporation
Avon Products, Inc.
Barclays Group US, Inc.
Bechtel Corporation
Best Buy
Big Lots Stores, Inc.
Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.
Burger King Corporation
Bed Bath & Beyond Inc.
Ball Corporation
Barnes & Noble, Inc.
Baxter International Inc.
BB&T Corporation
Becton, Dickinson and Company
Bemis Company, Inc.
Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
BorgWarner Inc.
Boston Scientific Corporation
Bristol-Myers Squibb Company
Caesars Entertainment
Cargill, Incorporated
Charles Schwab & Co., Inc.
US Department of Justice
Chevron Inc
ConocoPhillips Company
Coventry Health Care Inc.
Cox Enterprises, Inc.
McGraw-Hill
Crown Holdings, Inc.
Charter Communications, Inc.
Cognizant Technology Solutions 
Costco Wholesale Corporation
Cablevision Systems Corporation
Cameron International Corporation
Capital One Financial Corporation
CBRE Group, Inc.
CenturyLink, Inc.
Chubb Corporation
Computer Sciences Corporation
ConAgra Foods, Inc.
Con-way Inc.
Corning Incorporated
CSX Corporation
Cummins Inc.
Delaware North Companies, Inc.
Domino's Pizza 
Dunkin' Donuts 
Olive Garden
Chili's Grill & Bar 
DISH Network Corporation
Dollar Tree, Inc.
Dana Holding Corporation
Danaher Corporation
DaVita HealthCare Partners Inc.
Dean Foods Company
Deutsche Bank USA
US Department of Veterans Affairs
Dillards, Inc.
Dole Food Company, Inc
Dollar General Corporation
Dover Corporation
Dow Chemical Company
Duke Energy Corporation
EmblemHealth, Inc.
Emerson Electric 
Marriott International
Enterprise Rent-A-Car Company
Ernst & Young LLP
Colgate Palmolive
eBay Inc.
Express Scripts
Ecolab Inc.
Eli Lilly and Company
EMC Corporation
EMCOR Group, Inc.
Estee Lauder Companies, Inc.
Exelon Corporation
Exxon Mobil Corporation
First Data Corporation
Facebook, Inc.
Fifth Third Bancorp
Frontier Communications Corporation
Family Dollar Stores, Inc.
Fidelity National Financial, Inc.
Fidelity National Information Services, Inc.
FirstEnergy Corporation
Fluor Corporation
Foot Locker, Inc.
Ford Motor Company
Alcoa
Subway
Gamestop Corporation
Gannett Co.
General Electric 
General Mills, Inc.
General Motors Company
Genworth Financial Inc
Goldman Sachs Group, Inc.
Google Inc.
Halliburton
HCR ManorCare, Inc.
HCSC Group
Health Care Service Corporation
Health Management Associates, Inc.
Health Net, Inc.
Hess Energy Inc.
Highmark Inc.
HSBC Bank USA
Hy-Vee, Inc.
Henry Schein, Inc.
H.J. Heinz Company
Hartford Financial Services Group
Hewlett-Packard Company
Hillshire Brands Company
Home Depot, Inc. 
Honeywell International Inc.
Hormel Foods Corporation
Huntington Ingalls Industries
Independence Blue Cross, Inc.
Instagram, Inc.
International Paper 
Intel Corporation
Illinois Tool Works Inc.
Ingram Micro Inc.
International Business Machines


Jabil Circuit
Jefferies & Company
John Deere
Johnson & Johnson Inc.
J.C. Penney Company
Jacobs Engineering Group Inc.
Jarden Corporation
Johnson Controls, Inc.
Kaiser Foundation Hospitals, Inc.
KFC 
Kiewit Corporation
Kimberly Clark Worldwide Inc.
PwC
Koch Industries, Inc.
Kroger Foods, Inc.
KBR, Inc.
Kellogg Company
Kindred Healthcare, Inc.
Kohls Corporation
Kelly Services, Inc.
Kraft Foods Group, Inc.
Laboratory Corporation of America
Liberty Interactive
Liberty Mutual Insurance
Liberty Global, Inc.
L-3 Communications
Las Vegas Sands Corp.
Lazard
LinkedIn Corporation
Loews Corporation
Mars, Incorporated
MASCO, Inc.
McKinsey & Company
Medtronic USA Inc.
Meijer, Inc.
Mattel, Inc.
Micron Technology, Inc.
Microsoft Corporation
Mondelez International, Inc.
ManpowerGroup
Marathon Petroleum Corporation
Marsh & McLennan Companies
Masco Corporation
McDonalds Corporation
Medtronic, Inc.
Merck & Company
Mohawk Industries, Inc.
Monsanto Company
Murphy Oil Corporation
National Oilwell Varco, L.P.
Nationwide
NBC Universal
New York Life Insurance Co.
News Corporation
Northern Trust Corporation
NCR Corporation
Nike, Inc.
Nordstrom, Inc.
Norfolk Southern Corporation
Nucor Corporation
Omnicom Group
OSI Restaurant Partners, LLC
Outback Steakhouse
Office Depot, Inc.
Officemax Incorporated
Omnicare, Inc.
Owens-Illinois, Inc.
Pinterest
Piper Jaffray & Co.
Pitney Bowes Inc.
Pizza Hut
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Progressive Casualty Insurance Company
Publix Super Markets
Parker-Hannifin Corporation
Pepsico, Inc.
Pfizer, Inc.
PNC Financial Services Group, Inc.
PPG Industries, Inc.
Praxair, Inc.
Prudential Financial
Dairy Queen
PACCAR Inc.
PetSmart, Inc
QUALCOMM Incorporated
Quest Diagnostics Incorporated
R.R. Donnelley & Sons Company
Ralph Lauren Corporation
Raytheon Company
Red Lobster
Regions Financial Corporation
Rite Aid
Rockwell Automation, Inc.
Ross Stores, Inc.
Ryder System, Inc.
Safeway Inc.
SAIC Inc
Samsung International, Inc.
Sanmina, Inc.
Sealed Air Corporation
Sears Holdings Corporation
Sempra Energy
Sherwin-Williams Company 
Smithfield Foods, Inc.
Sodexo, Inc.
Southern Company
Southwest Airlines Company
St. Jude Medical, Inc.
Stanley Black & Decker, Inc.
Starbucks 
Starwood Hotels & Resorts 
State Street Corporation
Stryker Corporation
SunTrust Banks, Inc.
SuperValu Inc.
Symantec Corporation
Taco Bell 
TD Bank, N.A.
Tenet Healthcare Corporation
Tenneco Inc.
Terex Corporation
Texas Instruments Incorporated
Textron Inc.
US Department of Homeland Security
Goodyear Tire & Rubber Company
US Department of the Treasury
US Department of Agriculture
United States Department of Defense
The Shaw Group Inc.
The Timken Corporation
Travelers Companies, Inc.
Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc
Time Warner Cable
TJX Companies, Inc.
TravelCenters of America 
Twitter, Inc.
Tyson Foods
U.S. Bancorp
Union Pacific Corporation
United Airlines, Inc
United Continental Holdings
United Parcel Service
United States Steel Corporation
United Technologies Corporation
Universal Health Services, Inc.
Unum
URS Corporation
US Airways Inc.


Valero Energy Corporation
Vanguard Health Systems, Inc.
Verizon Communications
Viacom Inc.
Visteon Corporation
W.W. Grainger, Inc.
Walgreen Co.
Walt Disney Company 
Waste Management, Inc.
WellPoint Inc.
Wells Fargo & Company
Wendys 
Weyerhaeuser Company
Whirlpool 
Whole Foods Market, Inc.
Wynn Resorts
Xerox 
Yahoo
YRC Worldwide, Inc.
Yum Brands
Arizona State University
kijian.com
retailcodes.com
McKesson
Bank of America
Citibank
J.P. Morgan Chase & Co.	
Apple
CVS Caremark
IBM
Citigroup
Cardinal Health
UnitedHealth Group
Procter & Gamble
Archer Daniels Midland
AmerisourceBergen
Boeing
Walmart Stores
Target
MetLife
Caterpillar
State Farm Insurance
Comcast
Dell
UPS
Intel
Lowe's
Coca-Cola
Lockheed Martin
Cisco Systems
FedEx
Sysco
CHS
Dupont
Humana
Hess
Oracle
Delta Airlines
Aetna
American Express
Allstate
Morgan Stanley
General Dynamics
Phillip Morris
Mass Mutual
Cigna
Baker Hughes
Aramark
Darden Restaurants
Gap
Lear
Western Digital
3M
Community Health Systems
AMR
American Airlines
Northrop Grumman
State of New York
Fairfax County Public Schools
Los Angeles Unified School District
Houston Independent School District
Hawaii Department of Education
Dallas Independent School District
Montgomery County Public Schools
Credit Suisse
Verizon Wireless
UPS
Sprint
Motorola
O'Reilly Automotive
Interpublic Group
Jones Financial
Freeport McMoRan
HCA Healthcare
Fidelity Investments
 UnitedHealthcare
Highmark Blue Cross Blue Shield
Regence BlueCross BlueShield
CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield
State of Texas
UBS
mywalmart.com
Pennsylvania State University
Ohio State University
University of Minnesota
University of Texas at Austin
Ashford University
University of Central Florida
Texas A&M University
University of Florida
Michigan State University
State University of New York
City University of New York
California State University
University of California
Miami Dade College
Indiana University
New York City Department of Education
New York City Public Schools
City of Chicago School District 29
Dade County School District
Broward County School District
Clark County School District
Philadelphia City School Disctrict
Hillsborough County School District
Detroit City School District
Palm Beach County School District
Orange County School District
San Diego City Unified School Disctrict
Prince Georges County Public Schools
Duval County School District
State of California
City of New York
City of Los Angeles
City of Chicago
City of Houston
City of Philadelphia
City of San Antonio
City of San Diego
City of Dallas
City of San Francisco
City of Charlotte
City of Fort Worth
City of Detroit
State Government Employees
Apple EPP
GE





Top Employee Discounts

123 Inkjets
1800Baskets.com
1800Flowers.com
1800Mattress
7 for All Mankind
Advance Auto Parts
Amazon.com
American Eagle Outfitters
Angie's List
Ann Taylor
Ann Taylor Loft
Apple Store
Art.com
Ashford.com
Avis
Banana Republic
Bare Necessities
Barnes & Noble.com
Best Buy
Best Western
Bloomingdales
Blue Nile
Bluefly.com
Bobbi Brown
Brooks Brothers Corporate Membership
Victoria's Secret
Budget-Rent-A-Car
BuyCostumes.com
Calvin Klein 
CheapTickets.com
Choice Hotels®
Uber
Clarins
Clinique
Crate & Barrel
Vegas.com
Orlando Employee Discounts
Crocs.com
Darphin
Experian
Dell Home Systems
UGG
DIRECTV
Drugstore.com
eBags.com
Eddie Bauer
Enterprise Rent-a-Car
Estée Lauder
Expedia.com
Express
Fairmont Hotels
Fandango
Finish Line
Footlocker.com
FragranceNet.com
FTD.com
Gap.com
GNC Vitamins
GoDaddy.com
Godiva
Golf Smith
Groupon
Harry & David
Hertz
Sprint Discount Program
Holiday Inn Express
Holiday Inn® Hotels
Home Depot
Hotels.com
Ice.com
InterContinental® Hotels Group
J. Crew
J. Jill
JC Penney
Kate Spade
Kiehls
Kipling
Kohls.com
La Quinta Inns & Suites
Lancome


Lands' End
Levis
LifeLock Identify Theft
Lord & Taylor
Lowes
Lucky Brand Jeans
Macys
Magazines.com
Marriott Hotels
MLB.com Shop
Modells
Molton Brown
Moosejaw
Motel 6®
Nautica
NBA Store
Saks Fifth Avenue OFF 5TH
Newegg
New York Times
NFL Shop
Nike Store
Nine West
Nordstrom
North Face
Office Depot
Old Navy
Orbitz
Origins
Philosophy
ProFlowers.com
Puma.com
Ralph Lauren
Red Envelope
REI
Restaurant.com
Saks Fifth Avenue
Sears
Sephora.com
Shari's Berries
Sheraton Hotels & Resorts
ShoeBuy.com
ShoeMall.com
Shoes.com
Sierra Trading Post
Snapfish
Solstice Sunglasses
Starbucks
Target
The Childrens Place
The Sports Authority
Tickets Now
TigerDirect.com
Timberland
Tory Burch
Travelocity
TurboTax
Under Armour
Verizon Wireless
Walmart.com
Weight Watchers
Westin Hotels
teleflora
Spanx
Starwood Hotels & Resorts
Club Monaco
Kenneth Cole
HotelStorm
Neiman Marcus Last Call
Rite Aid
Ticket Monster
Pier 1 Imports
Zipcar
Cox Communications
L.L.Bean
Kmart
Walgreens
Staples
T-Mobile
Sprint
Shutterfly


Tiny Prints
Coach
StubHub
hockeymonkey
Eve's Addiction
Pottery Barn
Rag & Bone
iTunes
Asos
Omaha Steaks
SeaWorld Parks
Samsung
Hilton Hotels & Resorts®
Geico
Evite
MICROSOFT HOME USE PROGRAM
Booking.com
Lacoste
Dockers
Cole Haan
CB2
Quicken Loans
Design Within Reach
Hyatt Hotels
Forever 21
West Elm
Liberty Mutual Insurance
CheapOair.com
T.J. Maxx
ESET
HP EMPLOYEE PURCHASE PROGRAM 
buybuy BABY
Old Pueblo Traders
Diesel
Talbots
Bed Bath & Beyond®
Sperry Top-Sider
Toms
Jo Malone
UNIQLO
39DollarGlasses.com
Gilt.com
HalloweenCostumes.com
Ticketmaster
Woot
Esurance
American Apparel
Williams-Sonoma
Verizon Broadband Services
La Mer
nomorerack.com
Carolee
PBteen
Pottery Barn Kids
Verizon Wireless Ford Employees
Verizon Wireless NYU Medical Center Employees
J.Crew Factory
DraftKings
Cars.com
Michael Kors
Billabong
QVC
Dell Member Purchase Program
DISH
American Express® Gift Cards
AccorHotels
LendingTree.com
GE Appliances Warehouse
W Hotels Worldwide
Embassy Suites by Hilton™
InterContinental® Hotels & Resorts
Hilton Garden Inn
Fairfield Inn & Suites® Marriott
Beaches® Resorts 
Atlantis Paradise Island Resort
Sandals Resorts International
Via
Parallels
U.S. Bank











	TRITONE Trademark of Action Alignment, LLC. Serial Number: 86321275 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Computer & Software Products & Electr...
TRITONE










 
Get FREE email alerts













TRITONE  Trademark Information
 Action Alignment, LLC
Computer application software for mobile phones, portable computer devices and handheld computers, namely, software for business management




Perfect for these industries

Computer & Software Products & Electrical & Scientific Products





Words that describe this mark
application   software   mobile   phones      portable   devices   handheld   computers         software   business   management    
                                    




This is a brand page for the TRITONE trademark by Action Alignment, LLC 
                                in Nashville, TN, 37206.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this TRITONE trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Action Alignment, LLC of the TRITONE trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the TRITONE trademark.
                           






On Thursday, June 26, 2014,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        TRITONE by 
                        Action Alignment, LLC, Nashville, TN  37206.
                        The USPTO has given the TRITONE 
                        trademark serial  number of  86321275.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is ABANDONED - NO STATEMENT OF USE FILED.
                        The correspondent listed for TRITONE is 
                        
                        
                                            Robert P. Felber, Jr. of 
                                            WALLER LANSDEN DORTCH & DAVIS, LLP,  511 Union Street, Suite 2700 Nashville, TN,  37219
                                .
                            The TRITONE trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Computer & Software Products & Electrical & Scientific Products
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for TRITONE 
                            is Computer application software for mobile phones, portable computer devices and handheld computers, namely, software for business management. 
                            





Word mark:
 TRITONE


  Status/Status Date:  


ABANDONED - NO STATEMENT OF USE FILED

8/15/2016






  Serial Number:  
86321275


  Filing Date:  
6/26/2014


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
Computer application software for mobile phones, portable computer devices and handheld computers, namely, software for business management


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
TradeMark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
11/18/2014


Last Applicant/Owner:

Action Alignment, LLCNashville, TN  37206
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Standard Character Mark


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


Robert P. Felber, Jr.
WALLER LANSDEN DORTCH & DAVIS, LLP
511 Union Street
Suite 2700
Nashville, TN,  37219





 Intent to Use Trademark - Applicant has not submitted proof of use in commerce the the USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (009) - Scientific, nautical, surveying, photographic, cinematographic, optical, weighing, measuring, signalling, checking (supervision), life-saving and teaching apparatus and instruments; apparatus and instruments for conducting, switching, transforming, accumulating, regulating or controlling electricity; apparatus for recording, transmission or reproduction of sound or images; magnetic data carriers, recording discs; automatic vending machines and mechanisms for coin operated apparatus; cash registers, calculating machines, data processing equipment and computers; fire extinguishing apparatus.


First Use Anywhere: 
Not provided


First Use In Commerce: 
Not provided





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your TRITONE trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

8/15/2016
ABANDONED - NO STATEMENT OF USE FILED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



Robert P. Felber, Jr.


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of TRITONE trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search tritone on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for TRITONE 




TRITONE is providing Computer application software for mobile phones, portable computer devices and handheld computers, namely, software for business management.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 


















 










'Artist Growth' tech for Music industry is first of 'action alignment' series - Venture Nashville























Welcome Visitor Tuesday, July 25, 2017 





Home


About Us


AllStories


SubscribeNow


 Advanced Search














 Access



                                                                                                                          About Us
                                                                                                                                                                                      SUBSCRIBE
                                                                                                                                                                                      Most Pop Stories
                                                                                                                                                                                      Tweeting
                                                                                                                                                                                      Ethics & Standards
                                                                                                                                                                                      Login
                                                                                                                                                                                      Account



 Advertisement










 Nashville Life



                                                                                                                          Today's Weather
                                                                                                                                                                                      The Parks
                                                                                                                                                                                      Arts in Nashville














'Artist Growth' tech for Music industry is first of 'action alignment' series


By Milt Capps  updated 2 August 2012 1011 hrs


Published January 17, 2012


 Comment  Print








Updates   Aug. 2012: Artist Growth parent Action Alignment LLC today reported to SEC a $1MM raise.-Ed. 
ACHIEVING VIBE will be the least of Nashville-based Artist Growth's worries, it seems. After months of intense development and market-teasing viral communications, there's plenty of buzz around AG's formal debut tonight during a private event at the Country Music Hall of Fame & Museum.
Metro Nashville Mayor Karl Dean and singer-songwriters Vince Gill and Cowboy Jack Clement are among those scheduled to be on-hand for this evening's Hall of Fame event, at 6:30 p.m.
The focal-point is what Artist Growth's creators describe online as a "groundbreaking mobile platform" that provides artists "streamlined career management tools to track daily business tasks and coordinate team projects, all in one place." Referring to the artists the company is targeting, co-founder and CEO Matt Urmy told VNC, "this thing's going to change their lives."






Matt Urmy



Artist Growth is the first branded business created by Urmy and co-founder and Chief Administrative Officer Jonathan Sexton. (They have also created Action Alignment LLC, a Delaware-registered company, as the umbrella for their holdings.) The founding duo, 33 and 30 years old, respectively, have already raised $1MM in outside capital, Urmy confirmed for VNC. The co-founders conceived their idea in 2009, began developing the application 18 months ago and coding began in July 2011, Urmy said.
Asked about raising further capital, Urmy would only comment that the venture will be proceeding with a raise through "appropriate channels" during the current quarter of 2012. Several sources familiar with the situation told VNC the company will soon begin a fresh capital round, and that investors are already approaching the company, as a result of its earlier publicity and word-of-mouth. One source said the entrepreneurs have recently been "turning-away money" from suitors, of which "there's already a line," the source added.
Urmy was also generally mum regarding pending announcements of partnerships and alliances; however, when asked by VNC, he acknowledged that BMI would be a logical ally. Artist Growth information online indicates that its tech platform is to be integrated with one or more performing rights organizations.






Jon Sexton



In separate interviews, co-founders Urmy and Sexton told VNC they are now intently focused on launching Artist Growth.
Nonetheless, the company's "action alignment" technology will be driven into healthcare, education and other sectors, each with sector-specific brands. According to the sources, investment from the forthcoming capital raise is partly intended to enable the company to push its wares into several sectors simultaneously, to leverage rising interest in all-things-mobility.







The Artist Growth toolkit, which debuts today, seems to challenge the proverbial Swiss Army knife for functionality.
The technology makes available to subscribers via Web and mobile platforms an "action pack" of tools for managing bands' activities and performers' careers, Urmy explained. The company's site says that via a single interface its technology (for iPhone, Android, Web) integrates finances, calendars, inventory, contacts, social media and mentoring resources (the latter stored in an on-demand video library of expert commentary, currently dubbed AGTV).
The company will present Artist Growth later this week at the NAMM Show in Anaheim; later this month at the Midem event in Cannes, France; at the Folk Alliance show in Memphis in February; and, in March during Austin's South by Southwest.
The founders have submitted a patent application for their technology, and beta access is available in Nashville, Knoxville and New York City. With today's debut of the initial suite, trial subscriptions are to be available at "very affordable" rates, Sexton told VNC. Earlier this morning, a $4.95 monthly starter rate was cited on the Artist Growth website, which also offered a "free trial coupon."
The Artist Growth product buzz will be heightened by the startup team, its backers and its tech-savvy resources. After all, prominent investors Harry Jacobson, M.D. (retired former vice chancellor for health affairs at Vanderbilt University), and Joe Galante of Sony fame are onboard, as is digipreneur Mark Montgomery, who earned his stripes at the former Echomusic. In addition, John Curtis, the 32-year-old founder of Austin-based contractor Quotient Solutions, has personally taken a stake in the firm, Curtis confirmed for VNC.
Both Urmy and Sexton are seasoned entertainers and sources interviewed by VNC accorded them both full Cred for their knowledge of what resources performers and bands need to make a business our their talent and energy.






Mark Montgomery



Asked about his investment in Artist Growth, investor Montgomery seemed to be alluding to sectors beyond Music when he said, in part, "Artist Growth is exciting to me for three reasons. First, it was founded on passion for a problem by two young bulls who will not be stopped. Second, it addresses a real problem in the market with a real solution. Third, the technology in the abstract has enormous market potential beyond music..."
The startup's outside advisors include attorneys with Waller Lansden Dortch & Davis; Austin-based intellectual-property attorney Jack Musgrove; and, Shore Fire Media, a New Jersey-based firm that specializes in music-entertainment PR, according to Urmy. Urmy has not yet chosen an accountant and-or back-office services provider, he said. The Artist Growth logo was developed via LogoGuru, the offshore crowd-sourcer; and, much of its video and animation content was produced by Knoxville-based Nick Hollansbe, who, according to Linkedin, is manager of online initiatives at E.W. Scripps.







Urmy told VNC that in addition to himself and Knoxville-resident Sexton, the startup's management team includes Provo, Utah-based Chief Technology Officer Joey Dempster, a singer-songwriter during college who subsequently co-founded Logoworks, exiting via a 2007 sale to Hewlett Packard; and, Nashville-based musician-marketer Jacob Jones, who has a special talent for guerrilla marketing, said Urmy.
Asked about his decision to take a personal stake in the company while also serving as a contractor, Quotient's Curtis told VNC, "It's rare that I cross over to the investor side"; but, he explained, he was impressed with Urmy-Sexton's real-world knowledge of their users' needs.






John Curtis



"There wasn't a lot of guessing" when Quotient posed questions to the owners, Curtis said. "It's one of the few startup companies that we've run into...that really seems like they have all the criteria to be successful," he added.
Connections: Co-founder Matt Urmy's father, Norman Urmy, worked for Jacobson during a portion of Urmy's several decades of service within Vanderbilt University Medical Center. Also, Curtis-led Quotient Solutions is the software developer recommended to Matt Urmy and Sexton by Mike Muhney, who is a longtime business associate of Jacobson. Muhney is the entrepreneur who founded Act! Software, the pioneering company that attracted investment from Jacobson and others, decades ago. Muhney told VNC he plans to attend tonight's Artist Growth debut.
Footnote: Matt Urmy told VNC that his father, Norm, harbors a lifelong passion for woodworking. He began playing an instrument in his 50's and now owns and operates Red Mountain Guitars in Franklin. VNC


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 








Related ArticlesBoard of directors update for Nashville Technology CouncileProcurement startup GreenLight Medical maps Series A-B raisesVenture Notes - 23 June 2017Post-Dart Music, HAAWK CEO mulls capraise, nourishing ties to hometownVU School of Medicine ramps-up The Radx incubatorwith 17 entrants in Innovation ChallengeCEO charts Core Rights' path after Dart asset buy, confirms investor talksVenture Notes - 12 June 2017Brody-Waite: EC won't sub 'vaporware' or coffee for sustainability + valueAdvisors: Jack Waddey says 'Nashville still needs major research park'Jumpstart Foundry seeks greater mindshare among U.S. HC entrepreneursVanderbilt University steps-up pace in pursuit of international agendaVenture Notes - 18 May 2017New entrepreneur-in-res at EC, launches 'Milk the Moment' startupCondra's Amplion Clinical Communications elevates Grant to presidencyMarcom: Snell's Gyrosity eyes capital raise and Crosshair spin-outVenture Notes - 1 May 2017At Satchel Health, Macy to CPO, succeeded as CEO by Lanson HydeNPREX eyes capital raises for direct-licensing performing rights platformWearables startup WiseWear's Series A underway, plans Nashville officeVenture Notes - 11 April 2017Center for Entrepreneurship staffs-up withinVU Owen Graduate School of Management










Share: 











Tags: Action Alignment, Android, Artist Growth, BMI, Country Music Hall of Fame and Museum, Cowboy Jack Clement, digital entertainment, entrepreneurs, Harry Jacobson, investment, iPhone, Jack Musgrove, Joe Galante, John Curtis, Jon Sexton, Mark Montgomery, Matt Urmy, Mike Muhney, Mobile, music, Nick Hollansbe, Norman Urmy, performing rights, Quotient Solutions, Shore Fire Media, startups, Vanderbilt University, Waller Lansden Dortch & Davis
















 @MILTCAPPS



Tweets by @miltcapps













 




Powered by Bondware
News Publishing Software
The browser you are using is outdated!
You may not be getting all you can out of your browsing experience 
 and may be open to security risks!
Consider upgrading to the latest version of your browser or choose on below:

Mozilla Firefox
Google Chrome


Ok







X


Log In to Venture Nashville







                            Welcome to the site. Please login.                        



Username/Email: 





Password: 






Login







Username/Password login is only available for paid subscribers.  If you recently subscribed, please check your SPAM filter for login info.






Forgot your username or password? Click Here












Action Alignment LLC - Relationship Science



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Action Alignment LLC



Overview
Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Recent Transactions



Action Alignment LLC



 OVERVIEW



Headquarters


521 Gallatin Avenue Suite 6 Nashville  Tn  37206





 Executives & Employees



Matt Urmy

Chief Executive Officer




Josh Bowling

Chief Financial Officer





Jonathan Sexton

Chief Operating Officer & Secretary







                          Board of Directors                        



Joseph C. Galante

Vice Chair at The CMA Foundation




Harry Jacobson

Co-Founder at Ambulatory Services of America, Inc.





Jonathan Sexton

Chief Operating Officer & Secretary at Action Alignment LLC




Matt Urmy

Chief Executive Officer at Action Alignment LLC





Harry R. Jacobsen

Member, Board of Directors at Action Alignment LLC




Mark Montgomery

Member, Board of Directors at Action Alignment LLC







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to Action Alignment LLC



                        Action Alignment LLC                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Action Alignment LLC






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Action Alignment LLC.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Recent Transactions



 Details Hidden



                                    Action Alignment LLC raised money in a private placement transaction                                                                    




 Details Hidden



                                    Action Alignment LLC raised money in a private placement transaction                                                                    






You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤


















BBB Business Profile | Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC | Accreditation























Home
 > 
Accredited Business Directory
 > 
Tire Dealers
 > 
Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC














BBB Accredited Business Profile



                            Is this your business? 
                                Claim it now.








Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC



Request a Quote

































Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC






            Business Information
        






(325) 651-2900

Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC

        4011 S. Chadbourne
        San Angelo, TX 76903
    




                 WEBSITE
            





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 05/27/2005
            

                Business Started Locally: 06/01/2003
            

                Business Incorporated: 08/15/2002 in TX






            Business Management
        


                    Greg Hurst, Owner
                






            Business Category
        


                Tire Dealers
            




                            Auto Repair & Service
                        

                            Towing - Automotive
                        




See More Business Categories
See Less Business Categories









 







BBB Accreditation





                BBB Accredited Since 05/25/2005
            

                BBB has determined that Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC meets Standards of BBB Accreditation, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            

                BBB accreditation does not mean that the business's products or services have been evaluated or endorsed by BBB, or that BBB has made a determination as to the business's product quality or competency in performing services.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        












 




                Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC
            
BBB ACCREDITATION SINCE 05/25/2005










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    



100%




[1] Positive Reviews



[0] Neutral Reviews



[0] Negative Reviews



[1] Total Customer Reviews
                        




                        This business has no complaints filed
                    









Composite Score:





                        Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC has received 5 out of 5 stars based on 1 Customer Reviews and a BBB Rating of A+.
                        






                            Comprised of 67% BBB Rating and 33% Customer Review Rating.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business. The Customer Review
                            Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive, neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                        

                            The BBB letter grade represents the BBB's opinion of how the business is likely to interact with its customers.
                            The BBB grade is based on BBB file information about the business.
                            In some cases, a business' grade may be lowered if the BBB does not have sufficient
                            information about the business despite BBB's requests for that information from the business.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating plus the BBB Rating is not a guarantee of a business'
                            reliability or performance. BBB recommends that consumers consider a business'
                            BBB Rating and Customer Review Rating in addition to all other available information
                            about the business.
                        









        Request a Quote
    






Share your experience


Submit a Review


Submit a Complaint












Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 




















 










BBB Accredited Business Reviews in San Angelo - U.S. BBB

















































































 








BBBHomeAccredited Business Directory
BBB Accredited Business Directory
Find Businesses You Can Trust



Find an Accredited Business by entering a category keyword or business name below
Start typing your category or keywords.
Or, Search by Business Name.







 Browse the 
25 most popular categories.
 Contractors - General (40)
Insurance Agency (31)
Restaurants (31)
Roofing Contractors (20)
Plumbing Contractors (17)
Auto Repair & Service (22)
Construction & Remodeling Services (18)
Painting Contractors (18)
Contractors - Electrical (15)
Heating & Air Conditioning (15)
Carpet & Rug Cleaners (10)
Auto Dealers - Used Cars (18)
Banks (10)
Tile - Ceramic - Contractors & Dealers (10)
Real Estate (15)
Air conditioning & Heating Contractors - Residential (19)
Remodeling Services (10)
Attorneys (11)
Air conditioning & Heating Contractors - Commercial (18)
Veterinarians (10)
Movers (9)
Concrete Contractors (5)
Pest Control Services (6)
HOUSE CLEANING (5)
Appliances - Small - Service & Repair (3)





Categories in alphabetical order.



























Popular categories.
Loading ...



































XWhat is a BBB Business Review?
We offer free reviews on businesses that include background, licensing, consumer experience and other information such as governmental actions that is known to BBB. These reviews are provided for businesses that are BBB accredited and also for businesses that are not BBB accredited.

XBBB Reporting Policy
As a matter of policy, BBB does not endorse any product, service or business.
BBB Business Reviews are provided solely to assist you in exercising your own best judgment. Information in this BBB Business Review is believed reliable but not guaranteed as to accuracy.
BBB Business Reviews generally cover a three-year reporting period. BBB Business Reviews are subject to change at any time.













San Angelo Tire Dealers - Find BBB Accredited Tire Dealers in San Angelo

















































































 

Narrow Results
 Zip Code

5 mi.
10 mi.
25 mi.
50 mi.
100 mi.
300 mi.
Distance






 

Show Results In
 City
GA
MI
OH
OR
TX
State





 





Tire Dealers in Popular San Angelo Cities

San Angelo

Tire Dealers in Other Cities

Abilene, TXAmarillo, TXGrand Rapids, MIHuntsville, ALLittle Rock, ARManchester, NHNorfolk, VARaleigh, NC




BBBHomeAccredited Business DirectoryTire Dealers
BBB Accredited Tire Dealers
Localize Results: 



City/state or zipcode

Sponsored Listings of BBB Accredited Tire Dealers


 








Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC
4011 S. Chadbourne San Angelo, TX
325 651-2900
BBB Accredited Business Since May 2005
Click Business Name for More Informationand Business Review

Map
Full Ad






 


All BBB Accredited Tire Dealers



 








Angelo Tire & Alignment LLC
4011 S. Chadbourne San Angelo, TX
325 651-2900
BBB Accredited Business Since May 2005
Click Business Name for More Informationand Business Review

Map
Full Ad






 




 


Firestone Tire and Service
4317 Southwest Blvd, San Angelo, TX
800 367-3872
BBB Accredited Business Since Jun 2001
Click Business Name for More Informationand Business Review

Map






 




 


Firestone Tire and Service Center
38 W Concho Ave, San Angelo, TX
800 367-3872
BBB Accredited Business Since Dec 1989
Click Business Name for More Informationand Business Review

Map






 




 


Goodyear Tire & Rubber Company
300 W Beauregard Ave, San Angelo, TX
325 653-6888
BBB Accredited Business Since Apr 1980
Click Business Name for Additional Locationsand Business Review

Emails
Map






 




 


Hargraves Tire & Auto
1617 Pulliam St, San Angelo, TX
325 653-4251
BBB Accredited Business Since Oct 2011
Click Business Name for More Informationand Business Review

Map






 




 


Tom's Tire World
15 W Concho Ave, San Angelo, TX
325 655-9555
BBB Accredited Business Since Feb 1995
Click Business Name for More Informationand Business Review

Emails
Map






 



  
Categories Related to Tire Dealers
Auto Inspection Stations
Auto Repair & Service
Battery Repairing & Rebuilding
Battery Supplies
Brake Service
Mufflers & Exhaust Systems
Shock Absorbers
Tire Distributors & Manufacturers
Tire Retread & Repair

If you would like to be listed in Tire Dealers, you can apply to become BBB Accredited.




























XWhat is a BBB Business Review?
We offer free reviews on businesses that include background, licensing, consumer experience and other information such as governmental actions that is known to BBB. These reviews are provided for businesses that are BBB accredited and also for businesses that are not BBB accredited.

XBBB Reporting Policy
As a matter of policy, BBB does not endorse any product, service or business.
BBB Business Reviews are provided solely to assist you in exercising your own best judgment. Information in this BBB Business Review is believed reliable but not guaranteed as to accuracy.
BBB Business Reviews generally cover a three-year reporting period. BBB Business Reviews are subject to change at any time.













Action Alignment, LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 25, 2017 8:00 PM ET
Internet Software and Services

Company Overview of Action Alignment, LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Action Alignment, LLC, through its subsidiary Artist Growth LLC, develops and offers an online platform that gives amateurs and seasoned professionals a tools to manage and track daily tasks, coordinate multi-dimensional projects, and grow a business steadily. Its platform uses technology to integrate finances, gig calendars, inventory, industry contacts, social media, performing rights organizations, and provide mentoring resources. Action Alignment, LLC was incorporated in 2011 and is based in Nashville, Tennessee.


521 Gallatin AvenueSuite 6Nashville, TN 37206United StatesFounded in 2011



Phone: 615-953-2841








Key Executives for Action Alignment, LLC




Mr. Matt Urmy


      	Co-Founder and Chief Executive Officer
      








Mr. Jonathan Sexton


      	Co-Founder and Chief Administrative Officer
      








Mr. Josh Bowling


      	Chief Financial Officer
      








Mr. Joey Dempster


      	Chief Technology Officer
      








Mr. Jacob Jones


      	Marketing Director
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 "Atlantic Tele-Satellite, Inc. United States .Club Domains LLC United States .Comdaq Corporation United States .Kache Media Management LLC United States @Court United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Action Alignment, LLC, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close































BBB Business Profile | Bacon Alignment, LLC | Accreditation
































Home
 > 
Accredited Business Directory
 > 
Auto Repair & Service
 > 
Bacon Alignment, LLC














BBB Accredited Business Profile



                            Is this your business? 
                                Claim it now.








Bacon Alignment, LLC



Request a Quote

































Bacon Alignment, LLC






            Business Information
        






(256) 766-6500

Bacon Alignment, LLC
14 years in business

        225 S Wood Ave
        Florence, AL 35630-6808
    




 EMAIL
            

                 WEBSITE
            





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 12/19/2006
            

                Business Started: 01/01/2003


                Business Started Locally: 01/01/2003
            

                Business Incorporated: 03/03/2005 in AL





            Type of Entity
             
            Limited Liability Company       
    




            Contact Information
        


                    Principal: Mr. James Ford, Owner
                





            Business Category
        


                Auto Repair & Service
            




                            Tire Dealers
                        

                            Air Conditioning Repair
                        

                            Auto Diagnostic Service
                        

                            Auto Electric Service
                        

                            Auto Repairing - Foreign
                        

                            Auto Repair - Shocks
                        

                            Auto Repair - Tune-Up
                        

                            Auto Repair - Power Steering
                        

                            Auto Repair - Maintenance
                        

                            Brake Service
                        

                            Lubricating Service - Automotive
                        

                            Radiators - Automotive
                        

                            Transmissions - Automobile
                        

                            Auto Services
                        

                            Wheels
                        




See More Business Categories
See Less Business Categories







            Products & Services
        
        this company offers a full range automotive services including: tire installation, tire repairs, tire rotations, front-end alignment,suspension work, brake work, lube/oil changes and preventive maintenance.

    




            Alternate Business Names
        


                    Bacon Alignment Service
                

                    Bacon Alignment
                







                    Number of Employees: 
                
                5
            



See Less Business Information
See More Business Information


 







BBB Accreditation





                BBB Accredited Since 04/24/2014
            

                BBB has determined that Bacon Alignment, LLC meets Standards of BBB Accreditation, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            

                BBB accreditation does not mean that the business's products or services have been evaluated or endorsed by BBB, or that BBB has made a determination as to the business's product quality or competency in performing services.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Bacon Alignment, LLC






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        












 




                Bacon Alignment, LLC
            
BBB ACCREDITATION SINCE 04/24/2014










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    


                        There are NO reviews for this business.Be the first to leave a review!
                    



                        This business has no complaints filed
                    












        Request a Quote
    






Share your experience


Submit a Review


Submit a Complaint












Share




Print


































































This content is provided by the business and may contain advertising. BBB does not review or endorse this content.


Tweets by Bacon Alignment, LLC

















×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 




















 










Find BBB Accredited Auto Repair Services in North Alabama





























































































Categories Related to Auto Repair & Service

Auto Electric Service


Auto Services


Auto Dealers - New Cars


Tire Dealers


Auto Parts & Supplies - Used & Rebuilt


Lubricating Service - Automotive


Auto Parts & Supplies - New


Auto Services - Oil & Lube


Auto Repairing - Foreign


Towing - Automotive


Auto Repair - Tune-Up


Air Conditioning Repair


Auto Repair - Shocks













CONNECT
WITH


			      Trustworthy Auto Repair Services			  



Connect with
Trustworthy Auto Repair Services
In Your Neighborhood

CONNECT
WITH

ACCREDITED BUSINESSES






Accredited Business Directory
Find Businesses You Can Trust

North Alabama HomeAccredited Business Directory / AutomotiveAuto Repair & Service
Auto Repair & Service







Legend

BBB Accredited Sponsor

BBB Accredited Business




Filter by


Categories Related to Auto Repair & Service






Filter by City


Albertville
Athens
Cullman
Decatur


Florence
Huntsville
Madison
Scottsboro






Categories Related to Auto Repair & Service




Brake Service
Transmissions - Automobile
Auto Air Conditioning
Auto Diagnostic Service


Auto Body Repair & Painting
Wheel Alignment, Frame & Axle Service - Auto
Auto Dealers - Used Cars
Show More Business Types





Auto Repair & Service in Local Cities

Auto Repair & Service in Other Cities

Birmingham, AL
Grand Rapids, MI
Tyler, TX
Des Moines, IA
Miami, FL
Springfield, MA
Abilene, TX
Halifax, NS


BBB Accredited Auto Repair Services  have all agreed to a set of high standards in their business practices. Learn more about BBB Accreditation.






All BBB Accredited  Auto Repair & Service






Business Name / Address
Type of Business
BBB Accreditation 

 







PAID AD



2 Friends Service Center

415 West Willow Street Scottsboro, AL
415 West Willow Street 
Scottsboro
AL

View Business Profile 

Map

Phone(256) 999-0196















 


A & D Auto Repair

        
                
        12841 US Highway 431 
        Guntersville, AL 
12841 US Highway 431
Guntersville
AL





 

 


AAMCO of Huntsville

        
                
        1007 Putman Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
1007 Putman Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


AAMCO Transmissions

        
                
        119 S Seminary St 
        Florence, AL 
119 S Seminary St
Florence
AL





 

 


Ace Auto Body

        
                
        1998 Highway 31 NW 
        Hartselle, AL 
1998 Highway 31 NW
Hartselle
AL





 

 


Adams Auto Body, Inc.

        
                
        17010 Highway 72 
        Rogersville, AL 
17010 Highway 72
Rogersville
AL





 

 


Affordable Automotive, LLC

        
                
        5132 County Road 703 
        Cullman, AL 
5132 County Road 703
Cullman
AL





 

 


Alexander Dodge, Chrysler, Jeep, & Ram Inc.

        
                
        6764 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
6764 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Alexander Ford, Inc.

        
                
        685 US Highway 431 
        Boaz, AL 
685 US Highway 431
Boaz
AL





 

 


Anderson Motor Company

        
                
        11261 Memorial Pkwy SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
11261 Memorial Pkwy SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Andy's Auto & Mustang Repair, LLC

        
                
        1401 Charity Ln 
        Hazel Green, AL 
1401 Charity Ln
Hazel Green
AL





 

 


Arnold's Auto Repair

        
                
        637 W Willow St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
637 W Willow St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Auto Body Center

        
                
        193 County Road 1294 
        Cullman, AL 
193 County Road 1294
Cullman
AL





 

 


Automotive Innovations

        
                
        3953 Highway 67 
        Somerville, AL 
3953 Highway 67
Somerville
AL





 

 


AutoNation Ford Fort Payne

        
                
        1916 Glenn Blvd SW 
        Fort Payne, AL 
1916 Glenn Blvd SW
Fort Payne
AL





 

 


Avis Rent A Car, Inc.

        
                
        9290 Madison Blvd 
        Madison, AL 
9290 Madison Blvd
Madison
AL





 

 


B & G Ok Tire Store

        
                
        1800 Highway 31 SW 
        Hartselle, AL 
1800 Highway 31 SW
Hartselle
AL





 

 


B's Express Lube

        
                
        1716 Blount Ave 
        Guntersville, AL 
1716 Blount Ave
Guntersville
AL





 

 


Bacon Alignment, LLC

        
                
        225 S Wood Ave 
        Florence, AL 
225 S Wood Ave
Florence
AL





 

 


Below Car Clinic, Inc

        
                
        1645 2nd Ave NW 
        Cullman, AL 
1645 2nd Ave NW
Cullman
AL





 

 


Bentley Buick GMC

        
                
        2120 Drake Ave SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2120 Drake Ave SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Bentley Cadillac

        
                
        2118 Drake Ave SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2118 Drake Ave SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Bentley Chevrolet Cadillac

        
                
        1950 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
1950 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


Bentley Hyundai

        
                
        3805 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
3805 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Bill Smith Buick-GMC, Inc.

        
                
        1940 2nd Ave NW 
        Cullman, AL 
1940 2nd Ave NW
Cullman
AL





 

 


Bob Hembree Chevrolet

        
                
        11982 US Highway 431 
        Guntersville, AL 
11982 US Highway 431
Guntersville
AL





 

 


Brackins Transmission, Inc.

        
                
        9830 Al Highway 157 
        Moulton, AL 
9830 Al Highway 157
Moulton
AL





 

 


Brad Bearden Automotive

        
                
        1410 Medlock Rd 
        Albertville, AL 
1410 Medlock Rd
Albertville
AL





 

 


Bramlett Automotive Group

        
                
        3305 Highway 31 S 
        Decatur, AL 
3305 Highway 31 S
Decatur
AL





 

 


Brian's Tire & Service

        
                
        1024 Putman Dr NW Ste 2 
        Huntsville, AL 
1024 Putman Dr NW Ste 2
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Century Automotive - BMW Volvo Jaguar Land Rover Porsche

        
                
        3800 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
3800 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Chambers Auto Repair

        
                
        3309 Sexton Rd SE 
        Decatur, AL 
3309 Sexton Rd SE
Decatur
AL





 

 


Champion Chevrolet, Inc.

        
                
        921 S Clinton St 
        Athens, AL 
921 S Clinton St
Athens
AL





 

 


Champion Chrysler Dodge Jeep

        
                
        907 S Clinton St 
        Athens, AL 
907 S Clinton St
Athens
AL





 

 


Champion of Decatur, Inc.

        
                
        3831 US Highway 31 S 
        Decatur, AL 
3831 US Highway 31 S
Decatur
AL





 

 


Checker Auto Body Repair, Inc.

        
                
        6235 Mastin Lake Rd NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
6235 Mastin Lake Rd NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Chevrolet of Boaz

        
                
        1134 US Highway 431 
        Boaz, AL 
1134 US Highway 431
Boaz
AL





 

 


Clem Tire Company

        
                
        908 US Highway 72 E 
        Athens, AL 
908 US Highway 72 E
Athens
AL





 

 


Clem Tire Company

        
                
        7907 Highway 72 W 
        Madison, AL 
7907 Highway 72 W
Madison
AL





 

 


Clem Tire Company

        
                
        2206 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2206 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Cro Wee Auto Repair, LLC

        
                
        2109 Triana Blvd SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2109 Triana Blvd SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Cullman Chrysler Dodge Jeep Ram

        
                
        300 Benchmark Way 
        Cullman, AL 
300 Benchmark Way
Cullman
AL





 

 


Darrell's Auto Repair

        
                
        1648 5th Ave SE 
        Decatur, AL 
1648 5th Ave SE
Decatur
AL





 

 


David's Radiator & Auto AC Repair

        
                
        604 Wheeler Ave NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
604 Wheeler Ave NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Dean's Garage LLC

        
                
        12665 Alabama Highway 79 
        Scottsboro, AL 
12665 Alabama Highway 79
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Dennis Johnson Auto Repair Center, Inc.

        
                
        1114 Old Railroad Bed Rd 
        Madison, AL 
1114 Old Railroad Bed Rd
Madison
AL





 

 


Dent Systems

        
                
        403 Pratt Ave NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
403 Pratt Ave NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Ding Masters, Inc.

        
                
        600 Grand Ave 
        Muscle Shoals, AL 
600 Grand Ave
Muscle Shoals
AL





 

 


DK Automotive

        
                
        3301 6th Ave SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
3301 6th Ave SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Donohoo Chevrolet, LLC

        
                
        1000 Greenhill Blvd NW 
        Fort Payne, AL 
1000 Greenhill Blvd NW
Fort Payne
AL





 

 


Eddie Preuitt Ford

        
                
        710 Highway 31 NW 
        Hartselle, AL 
710 Highway 31 NW
Hartselle
AL





 

 


Euro Tech BMW Repair

        
                
        8211-B Stephanie Dr SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
8211-B Stephanie Dr SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Expert Oil Change

        
                
        2624 Helton Dr 
        Florence, AL 
2624 Helton Dr
Florence
AL





 

 


Fiat of Huntsville

        
                
        6523 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
6523 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Fikes Chevrolet, Inc.

        
                
        771 Military St N 
        Hamilton, AL 
771 Military St N
Hamilton
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire & Service

        
                
        1301 Memorial Pkwy NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
1301 Memorial Pkwy NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire & Service

        
                
        8634 Highway 72 W 
        Madison, AL 
8634 Highway 72 W
Madison
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire And Service

        
                
        940 Old Monrovia Rd 
        Huntsville, AL 
940 Old Monrovia Rd
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire And Service

        
                
        1020 Airport Rd SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
1020 Airport Rd SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire And Service

        
                
        2010 Bob Wallace Ave SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2010 Bob Wallace Ave SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire And Service

        
                
        100 Weatherly Rd SE 
        Huntsville, AL 
100 Weatherly Rd SE
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Firestone Tire and Service

        
                
        Bldg # 3240 Goss Rd 
        Redstone Arsenal, AL 
Bldg # 3240 Goss Rd
Redstone Arsenal
AL





 

 


Fixed Right Automotive

        
                
        25 Freedom Dr 
        Arab, AL 
25 Freedom Dr
Arab
AL





 

 


Garner - Pierce Autos, LLC

        
                
        2261 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
2261 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


Gilbert & Baugh Ford, Inc.

        
                
        10195 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
10195 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Gilbert's Jeeps

        
                
        6494 US Highway 72 
        Athens, AL 
6494 US Highway 72
Athens
AL





 

 


Goins Auto Repair

        
                
        4204 Huntsville Rd 
        Florence, AL 
4204 Huntsville Rd
Florence
AL





 

 


Harbin Chevrolet, LLC

        
                
        570 Micah Way 
        Scottsboro, AL 
570 Micah Way
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Hartman's Service Repair & Fuel

        
                
        825 Madison St SE 
        Huntsville, AL 
825 Madison St SE
Huntsville
AL





 

 




PAID AD



HHE Automotive Repair

10537 US Highway 431 Albertville, AL
10537 US Highway 431 
Albertville
AL

View Business Profile 

Map

Phone(256) 660-5522
















 


High Country Automotive, LLC

        
                
        3011 S Broad St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
3011 S Broad St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Hiley Mazda - Volkswagen - Audi

        
                
        6555 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
6555 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Holcomb Collision, LLC

        
                
        7708 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
7708 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Honda of Decatur, Inc.

        
                
        735 Beltline Rd SW 
        Decatur, AL 
735 Beltline Rd SW
Decatur
AL





 

 


Howard Bentley Buick GMC, Inc.

        
                
        4321 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
4321 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Huntsville Automotive, Inc.

        
                
        110 Benson Cir NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
110 Benson Cir NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Iverson's Gas Depot

        
                
        105 6th Ave NE 
        Decatur, AL 
105 6th Ave NE
Decatur
AL





 

 


Jerry Damson Arab

        
                
        810 N Brindlee Mountain Pkwy 
        Arab, AL 
810 N Brindlee Mountain Pkwy
Arab
AL





 

 


Jerry Damson Honda/Acura

        
                
        2200 Bob Wallace Ave SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2200 Bob Wallace Ave SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Jimmy Smith Buick - GMC

        
                
        24450 US Highway 72 
        Athens, AL 
24450 US Highway 72
Athens
AL





 

 


Joe V. Clayton Chevrolet, Inc.

        
                
        327 N Brindlee Mountain Pkwy 
        Arab, AL 
327 N Brindlee Mountain Pkwy
Arab
AL





 

 


John Carpenter Ford, Inc.

        
                
        14591 Court St 
        Moulton, AL 
14591 Court St
Moulton
AL





 

 


Johnson Foreign Auto, Inc.

        
                
        1215 Putman Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
1215 Putman Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Johnston Collision Service, Inc.

        
                
        5320 Highway 67 S 
        Somerville, AL 
5320 Highway 67 S
Somerville
AL





 

 


Junior Compton Motors, Inc.

        
                
        10590 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
10590 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Just GM Auto Repair Plus

        
                
        105 3rd Ave SW 
        Cullman, AL 
105 3rd Ave SW
Cullman
AL





 

 


Kevin's Auto Repair

        
                
        2315A Spring Branch Rd SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2315A Spring Branch Rd SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Lake City Auto Repair, Inc.

        
                
        628 Gunter Ave 
        Guntersville, AL 
628 Gunter Ave
Guntersville
AL





 

 


Landers McLarty Chevrolet

        
                
        4930 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
4930 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Landers McLarty Dodge Chrysler Jeep Ram

        
                
        6533 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
6533 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Landers McLarty Nissan & Mercedes Benz of Huntsville

        
                
        6520 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
6520 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Landers McLarty Subaru

        
                
        5790 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
5790 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Lee Barnett Auto Repair

        
                
        5800 Al Highway 79 S 
        Guntersville, AL 
5800 Al Highway 79 S
Guntersville
AL





 

 


Lexus of Huntsville

        
                
        6580 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
6580 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Long Lewis Volkswagen Mitsubishi

        
                
        1602 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
1602 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


Lynch Auto Repair

        
                
        387 Capshaw Rd 
        Madison, AL 
387 Capshaw Rd
Madison
AL





 

 


Lynn Layton Cadillac, Inc.

        
                
        2402 Highway 31 S 
        Decatur, AL 
2402 Highway 31 S
Decatur
AL





 

 


Lynn Layton Chevrolet, Inc.

        
                
        2416 Highway 31 S 
        Decatur, AL 
2416 Highway 31 S
Decatur
AL





 

 


Lynn Layton Ford

        
                
        3300 Highway 31 S 
        Decatur, AL 
3300 Highway 31 S
Decatur
AL





 

 


Lynn Layton Nissan

        
                
        2402 Highway 31 S 
        Decatur, AL 
2402 Highway 31 S
Decatur
AL





 

 


MAACO - Ingram Collision Center, Inc.

        
                
        2101 Miller Ferry Way SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2101 Miller Ferry Way SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Major Motors of Arab, Inc.

        
                
        501 N Brindlee Mountain Pkwy 
        Arab, AL 
501 N Brindlee Mountain Pkwy
Arab
AL





 

 


Market Street Performance

        
                
        109 N Market St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
109 N Market St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


McClary Ford, Inc.

        
                
        1104 US Highway 72 E 
        Athens, AL 
1104 US Highway 72 E
Athens
AL





 

 


McGriff Tire

        
                
        209 2nd Ave NW 
        Cullman, AL 
209 2nd Ave NW
Cullman
AL





 

 


Merriman's Garage, LLC

        
                
        1809 Main St W 
        Hartselle, AL 
1809 Main St W
Hartselle
AL





 

 


Mike's Auto Repair

        
                
        1708 Railroad Ave 
        Guntersville, AL 
1708 Railroad Ave
Guntersville
AL





 

 


Mike's Brake & Alignment

        
                
        917 Highway 31 SW 
        Hartselle, AL 
917 Highway 31 SW
Hartselle
AL





 

 


Mitch Smith Chevrolet

        
                
        1655 Cherokee Ave SW 
        Cullman, AL 
1655 Cherokee Ave SW
Cullman
AL





 

 


Mobil 1 Lube Express & Tire Pros

        
                
        209 Greenhill Blvd NW 
        Fort Payne, AL 
209 Greenhill Blvd NW
Fort Payne
AL





 

 


Monrovia Body Shop & Wrecker Service, Inc.

        
                
        165 Capshaw Rd 
        Madison, AL 
165 Capshaw Rd
Madison
AL





 

 


Mr. Transmission

        
                
        8918 Memorial Pkwy SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
8918 Memorial Pkwy SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Patterson Automotive Body Shop, Inc.

        
                
        16077 Parker Rd 
        Athens, AL 
16077 Parker Rd
Athens
AL





 

 


Performance Transmission

        
                
        904 West Willow St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
904 West Willow St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Pro Align Brake, Tire & Auto Repair

        
                
        2610 Gordon Terry Pkwy 
        Decatur, AL 
2610 Gordon Terry Pkwy
Decatur
AL





 

 


Professional Auto Repair

        
                
        301 S Market St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
301 S Market St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Ray Miller Buick-GMC, Inc.

        
                
        246 Cox Creek Pkwy 
        Florence, AL 
246 Cox Creek Pkwy
Florence
AL





 

 


Ray Pearman Lincoln, Inc.

        
                
        2501 Bob Wallace Ave SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2501 Bob Wallace Ave SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Regency Body Shop, Inc.

        
                
        500 County Road 61 
        Florence, AL 
500 County Road 61
Florence
AL





 

 


Rocket Automotive, Inc.

        
                
        109 8th St NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
109 8th St NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Ronnie Campbell's Collision Center

        
                
        4225 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
4225 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


Rousseau's Auto-Truck Service

        
                
        303 W Appletree St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
303 W Appletree St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Russ's Auto & Tire Service, Inc.

        
                
        533 W Willow St 
        Scottsboro, AL 
533 W Willow St
Scottsboro
AL





 

 


Russell Brothers Auto Electric

        
                
        2316 Memorial Pkwy SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2316 Memorial Pkwy SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Sand Mountain Toyota

        
                
        9167 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
9167 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Satterfields Auto Tech, LLC

        
                
        1946 Central Pkwy SW 
        Decatur, AL 
1946 Central Pkwy SW
Decatur
AL





 

 


Schneider Autohaus, LLC

        
                
        3711 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
3711 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


Serra Toyota of Decatur

        
                
        309 Beltline Place 
        Decatur, AL 
309 Beltline Place
Decatur
AL





 

 


Smith Infiniti of Huntsville, LLC

        
                
        1010 Old Monrovia Rd 
        Huntsville, AL 
1010 Old Monrovia Rd
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Smith's  Body Shop & Wrecker Services, LLC

        
                
        9821 US Highway 431 
        Albertville, AL 
9821 US Highway 431
Albertville
AL





 

 


Smith's Transmission, Inc.

        
                
        26985 Newby Rd 
        Athens, AL 
26985 Newby Rd
Athens
AL





 

 


South Side Motors, Inc.

        
                
        201 8th St NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
201 8th St NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Southern Automotives, LLC

        
                
        715 Spring St 
        Moulton, AL 
715 Spring St
Moulton
AL





 

 


Tankersley's Service Center, Inc.

        
                
        200 Highway 31 NW 
        Hartselle, AL 
200 Highway 31 NW
Hartselle
AL





 

 


Thornton Auto Sales & Service

        
                
        7233 Wall Triana Hwy # B 
        Madison, AL 
7233 Wall Triana Hwy # B
Madison
AL





 

 


Thornton Motors, LLC

        
                
        2536 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
2536 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


TNT Garage

        
                
        60 S Main St 
        Boaz, AL 
60 S Main St
Boaz
AL





 

 


Tom Sharp Tire Service

        
                
        2817 Governors Dr SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2817 Governors Dr SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Top Line Tires

        
                
        1071 Winchester Rd NE 
        Huntsville, AL 
1071 Winchester Rd NE
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Top Line Tires, Inc.

        
                
        2121 Memorial Pkwy SW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2121 Memorial Pkwy SW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Top Line Tires, Inc.

        
                
        2407 Jordan Ln NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2407 Jordan Ln NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Top Line Tires, Inc.

        
                
        8643 Madison Blvd 
        Madison, AL 
8643 Madison Blvd
Madison
AL





 

 


Top Line Tires, Inc.

        
                
        4830 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
4830 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Vick's Automotive

        
                
        3912 Cloverdale Rd 
        Florence, AL 
3912 Cloverdale Rd
Florence
AL





 

 


Victory Auto Sales, LLC

        
                
        2414 Memorial Pkwy NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2414 Memorial Pkwy NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Whitten's Full Service

        
                
        1261 Florence Blvd 
        Florence, AL 
1261 Florence Blvd
Florence
AL





 

 


Wilks Tire & Battery Service, Inc.

        
                
        428 N Broad St 
        Albertville, AL 
428 N Broad St
Albertville
AL





 

 


Wilks Tire & Battery Service, Inc.

        
                
        619 E Tennessee St 
        Florence, AL 
619 E Tennessee St
Florence
AL





 

 


Wilks Tire & Battery Service, Inc.

        
                
        2049 Beltline Rd SW 
        Decatur, AL 
2049 Beltline Rd SW
Decatur
AL





 

 


Wilks Truck Tire & Service Center

        
                
        2205 Highway 20 
        Decatur, AL 
2205 Highway 20
Decatur
AL





 

 


Woody Anderson Ford

        
                
        2500 Jordan Ln NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2500 Jordan Ln NW
Huntsville
AL





 

 


Worth Exhaust Center

        
                
        2201 University Dr NW 
        Huntsville, AL 
2201 University Dr NW
Huntsville
AL





 





1 of 16

10
20
50
Show All


Total Result: 152















If you would like to be listed in Auto Repair & Service, you can 
							apply to become BBB Accredited.











×











XWhat is a BBB Business Review?
We offer free reviews on businesses that include background, licensing, consumer experience and other information such as governmental actions that is known to BBB. These reviews are provided for businesses that are BBB accredited and also for businesses that are not BBB accredited.

XBBB Reporting Policy
As a matter of policy, BBB does not endorse any product, service or business.
BBB Business Reviews are provided solely to assist you in exercising your own best judgment. Information in this BBB Business Review is believed reliable but not guaranteed as to accuracy.
BBB Business Reviews generally cover a three-year reporting period. BBB Business Reviews are subject to change at any time.


 





















 


 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.








Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Incorporate Your Business Online  | incorporate.com










































































                        






    
    	877.583.4570
    
	


                    

                        






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                    





Click to call

                        






    
    	866.514.1346
    
	


                    






It's amazing what three letters can do.
Adding "Inc." or "LLC" to your business' name is more than a good look. It protects your personal assets, creates tax advantages, and much more.












Let's get to it.



Where are you incorporating?
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




How are you incorporating?
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Non-Profit Corporation


get started



									Is your shipping address outside the U.S.? 
								










Get Started
Form your business in a few simple steps. Choose the entity type for your company, conduct a business name search and start your new business today!


Stay on Track
Our Registered Agent Service is a lot like having a reliable employee dedicated to keeping your company compliant. You can count on us to monitor your company's status and ensure that you meet critical time-sensitive deadlines.


Rely on Us As You Grow
We're in the business to help your business grow. Our teams are well-versed in the needs of business owners and can help address common challenges throughout the lifecycle of your company.






Proud to be Featured in













Get the download on corporations, LLCs, and more.
download the free guide





Destination: Delaware  No matter where you're headquartered, incorporating in Delaware could be a great move for your balance sheet.
find out more








One,


two,


three,


incorporated.






Pick a business type.
Decide how you want to incorporate.



LLC 



The Perfect First Step. A great way to start out, protect your personal assets, and potentially grow if you aren't interested in offering stock. Get more information.
get incorporated





C Corporation 



Hello, Wall Street. In addition to personal asset protection, the C Corporation structure creates unlimited growth potential by allowing for the issue of any class of stock to any number of investors. Get more information.
get incorporated





S Corporation 



One Big Perk. Lots of Strings. This structure allows your company to become exempt from federal income taxes, but at the cost of additional rules and limitations. Get more information.
get incorporated





Nonprofit 



You Know Who You Are. When you're in business to do good, a nonprofit offers rock-solid personal asset protection, tax benefits, and more. Get more information.
get incorporated








get incorporated





Share some details.
Our application process is as simple and seamless as they come. Just give us the vital info about yourself and your business, and then our knowledgeable business experts will take it from there. And if you have any questions during the process, we're here day or night to talk it out.
get incorporated









Become official.
After handling all the filing and legwork, we'll let you know the instant your business is officially incorporated. Plus, our Registered Agents are available for the long haul, ready to help however they can.
get incorporated










•
•
•








Don't take it from us.






"Your company made it very easy for me to get an LLC and it saved me a lot of time and frustration."

Terri McLeanWoodbridge, VA 2014





"The process was very simple and the price was great!"

Marilyn FieldsMiddletown, NY 2014





"TCC has been the easiest and most complete service I've used. Great customer support and an amazing range of services offered at the best prices. Add to that the Compliance Watch service and it just can't be beat."

Ashton E. SmithFairfield, CT 2015



















Let's get to it.



Where are you incorporating?
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




How are you incorporating?
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Non-Profit Corporation


get started














Learn
Startup Wizard
Incorporate 101
Forming an LLC
LLC vs. Corporation
Business Licenses
Business Coaching




About Us
Our Story
Contact
Site Map




Events & Programs
International
Webinars
Affiliate Program











incorporate-logo-white-tcc

















































No dumb questions.
          We know there's a lot to consider when incorporating. That's why our business experts are here to help from 





8 a.m. to 8 p.m. ET, Monday through Thursday, and 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. ET, Friday. Call 
          
              
              
                  
                      






    
    	866.514.1346
    
	


                  

                      






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                  


contact us



























©  incorporate.com. All rights reserved. Privacy | Legal
incorporate.com is a service company and does not offer legal or financial advice.









LOADING







×
Want a free Business Formation Guide?
















By entering your telephone number and clicking "Grab Your Free Guide," you agree to let us follow up with you at this phone number regarding this and other services, or simply call us at 800.818.6082 to speak to someone who can help you.




Grab Your Free Guide













































LLC vs. Inc | Differences Between LLC & Inc  | incorporate.com

































































                        






    
    	877.583.4570
    
	


                    

                        






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                    




LLC vs. Corporation: What's the Difference?


Getting Started


Incorporate Now


Business Startup Wizard


Limited Liability Company(LLC)


S Corporation


C Corporation


Comparison Chart


Business Licenses


Employer ID Number (EIN)


Learn More


Benefits of Incorporating


Start-up Tasks


Corporation vs LLC


Bylaws & Operating Agreements


State Guides


eBooks


Business Coaching


Annual Report


Contact Us











You can think of these as two different company structures with very different tax requirements. Whichever way you choose to go, you're going to look more legit than the other guys. So just take a minute to consider your short-and long-term business goals to figure out which structure is best for you.
Advantages and Disadvantages
A limited liability company is a type of business structure that offers personal liability protections and a few tax advantages to boot. The "LL" in LLC is what protects your personal assets in the event of a judgment against your company. Corporations offer limited liability as well, so we're going to focus on the structural and taxation differences in the chart below.



Advantages of an LLC
Advantages of a Corporation




 No limit on the number of owners
 May issue shares of stock to attract investors


 Profit and loss are passed through to the owners' individual tax returns
 Corporate income splitting may help lower overall tax liability


 No annual meeting or minute book requirements
 






Disadvantages of an LLC
Disadvantages of a Corporation




 Cannot engage in corporate income splitting to lower tax liability
 C corp tax structure requires double taxation of corporate profits (s corp's does not)


 Cannot issue stock
 Must hold annual meetings and record minutes


 
 S corporations have restrictions on the number of owners



LLC or Corporation: Which One Is Right for Me?
Business goals aren't one size fits all, and neither is incorporating. When deciding which kind of corporation fits your business strategy, consider some of the differences that each kind offers. And take a deeper dive with our comprehensive comparison chart.
Find out which corporation is right for your business with our business wizard!
Learn More About Legal Business Structures
Regardless of which business structure you choose, incorporate.com can help you incorporate or form an LLC online or by phone in minutes.

Limited Liability Company (LLC) 
C Corporation 
S Corporation
Nonprofit Corporation
Professional Corporation 
Series LLC
Limited Partnership


Ready to Form Your Business?
get started





Let's get to it.

Incorporate in any state, starting as low as

$79

plus state fees

Get Started






Download a Free Business Formation Guide




First Name



Last Name



Email






Primary Phone






By entering your telephone number and clicking "Continue," you agree to let us follow up with you at this phone number regarding this and other services, or simply call us at 800-818-6082 to speak to someone who can help you. Your personal information will remain private.


















Let's get to it.



Where are you incorporating?
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




How are you incorporating?
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Non-Profit Corporation


get started














Learn
Startup Wizard
Incorporate 101
Forming an LLC
LLC vs. Corporation
Business Licenses
Business Coaching




About Us
Our Story
Contact
Site Map




Events & Programs
International
Webinars
Affiliate Program











incorporate-logo-white-tcc

















































No dumb questions.
          We know there's a lot to consider when incorporating. That's why our business experts are here to help from 





8 a.m. to 8 p.m. ET, Monday through Thursday, and 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. ET, Friday. Call 
          
              
              
                  
                      






    
    	866.514.1346
    
	


                  

                      






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                  


contact us



























©  incorporate.com. All rights reserved. Privacy | Legal
incorporate.com is a service company and does not offer legal or financial advice.









LOADING






































Incorporate Your Business Online  | incorporate.com










































































                        






    
    	877.583.4570
    
	


                    

                        






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                    





Click to call

                        






    
    	866.514.1346
    
	


                    






It's amazing what three letters can do.
Adding "Inc." or "LLC" to your business' name is more than a good look. It protects your personal assets, creates tax advantages, and much more.












Let's get to it.



Where are you incorporating?
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




How are you incorporating?
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Non-Profit Corporation


get started



									Is your shipping address outside the U.S.? 
								










Get Started
Form your business in a few simple steps. Choose the entity type for your company, conduct a business name search and start your new business today!


Stay on Track
Our Registered Agent Service is a lot like having a reliable employee dedicated to keeping your company compliant. You can count on us to monitor your company's status and ensure that you meet critical time-sensitive deadlines.


Rely on Us As You Grow
We're in the business to help your business grow. Our teams are well-versed in the needs of business owners and can help address common challenges throughout the lifecycle of your company.






Proud to be Featured in













Get the download on corporations, LLCs, and more.
download the free guide





Destination: Delaware  No matter where you're headquartered, incorporating in Delaware could be a great move for your balance sheet.
find out more








One,


two,


three,


incorporated.






Pick a business type.
Decide how you want to incorporate.



LLC 



The Perfect First Step. A great way to start out, protect your personal assets, and potentially grow if you aren't interested in offering stock. Get more information.
get incorporated





C Corporation 



Hello, Wall Street. In addition to personal asset protection, the C Corporation structure creates unlimited growth potential by allowing for the issue of any class of stock to any number of investors. Get more information.
get incorporated





S Corporation 



One Big Perk. Lots of Strings. This structure allows your company to become exempt from federal income taxes, but at the cost of additional rules and limitations. Get more information.
get incorporated





Nonprofit 



You Know Who You Are. When you're in business to do good, a nonprofit offers rock-solid personal asset protection, tax benefits, and more. Get more information.
get incorporated








get incorporated





Share some details.
Our application process is as simple and seamless as they come. Just give us the vital info about yourself and your business, and then our knowledgeable business experts will take it from there. And if you have any questions during the process, we're here day or night to talk it out.
get incorporated









Become official.
After handling all the filing and legwork, we'll let you know the instant your business is officially incorporated. Plus, our Registered Agents are available for the long haul, ready to help however they can.
get incorporated










•
•
•








Don't take it from us.






"Your company made it very easy for me to get an LLC and it saved me a lot of time and frustration."

Terri McLeanWoodbridge, VA 2014





"The process was very simple and the price was great!"

Marilyn FieldsMiddletown, NY 2014





"TCC has been the easiest and most complete service I've used. Great customer support and an amazing range of services offered at the best prices. Add to that the Compliance Watch service and it just can't be beat."

Ashton E. SmithFairfield, CT 2015



















Let's get to it.



Where are you incorporating?
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




How are you incorporating?
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Non-Profit Corporation


get started














Learn
Startup Wizard
Incorporate 101
Forming an LLC
LLC vs. Corporation
Business Licenses
Business Coaching




About Us
Our Story
Contact
Site Map




Events & Programs
International
Webinars
Affiliate Program











incorporate-logo-white-tcc

















































No dumb questions.
          We know there's a lot to consider when incorporating. That's why our business experts are here to help from 





8 a.m. to 8 p.m. ET, Monday through Thursday, and 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. ET, Friday. Call 
          
              
              
                  
                      






    
    	866.514.1346
    
	


                  

                      






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                  


contact us



























©  incorporate.com. All rights reserved. Privacy | Legal
incorporate.com is a service company and does not offer legal or financial advice.









LOADING







×
Want a free Business Formation Guide?
















By entering your telephone number and clicking "Grab Your Free Guide," you agree to let us follow up with you at this phone number regarding this and other services, or simply call us at 800.818.6082 to speak to someone who can help you.




Grab Your Free Guide













































Get Started in Any State  | incorporate.com




















































 Click to Complete by Phone



				CLOSE
				

















                        






    
    	877.583.4570
    
	


                    

                        






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                    












Select a State for Your New Business Entity
Select a State
Many businesses incorporate in their home states, but there are advantages to selecting other states.




Please Select
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




										Is your shipping address outside the U.S.? 
									



Continue





Choose the Type of Entity You'd Like to Form
Choose an Entity Type
LLC is the most popular entity type for small businesses, but it's not for everyone. We've provided descriptions of some common entity types to help you choose.










{{entity.type}}







{{ entity.type }}
{{ entity.description }}

 {{list}}

Frequently Asked Questions 


Packages starting at

${{entity.price | numberTwoDecimalsUnlessTrailingZeros}}
$

Plus State Fees

{{entity.discountCode}}
{{entity.intlDiscountCode}}

Select














								Need help selecting a state for your new business entity?
							

Choosing Your Home State
Why Delaware is the 'Best'



Top States to incorporate in



27% of customers select
										Delaware
									


12% of customers select
										California
									


10% of customers select
										Florida
									


6% of customers select
										New York
									


5% of customers select
										Nevada
									


5% of customers select
										Texas
									








 






        incorporate.com keeps my deadlines organized. The customer service is outstanding and those who have helped me have been nice, professional, and incredibly helpful. 
        
Susan C. – Washington, DC – 4/14/2015














 


The Corporate Veil Guarantee is not available to residents of North Carolina.
©2017 incorporate.com. All rights reserved. 
incorporate.com is a service company and does not offer legal or financial advice. 



Legal
Privacy










LOADING







×





Create









×




Along with picking the right entity type for your business, it's important to consider which state to incorporate in.
For most small business owners, the choice is simple: they incorporate in the state where their company is physically located, known as 'home state incorporation.' However, there are good reasons to consider forming your corporation or LLC in certain other states, including tax advantages, streamlined judicial processes, and easier business filing requirements.
For example, many business owners choose to incorporate in Delaware, which is a favored business jurisdiction for the previously mentioned and other reasons.

Delaware is widely considered to be one of the nation's most business-friendly jurisdictions. There are a number of reasons to incorporate your small business in Delaware, including:

Well-established and flexible business laws
Low franchise tax on small businesses
No tax on capital stock or assets
No state sales tax
A special business court (Court of Chancery) that minimizes the time and cost of commercial litigation
No residency requirement for shareholders, directors, and officers of a corporation or members or managers of an LLC























×
Just a few details and we'll get you started.

















By entering your telephone number and clicking "continue," you agree to let us follow up with you at this phone number regarding this and other services, or simply call us at 800.818.6082 to speak to someone who can help you.






Close


Continue














We just need a few details.
Is this the correct email address?

Thanks! Check your inbox for an email from incorporate.com. When you're ready to continue your order, simply click the link and it will be here waiting.





										Fill out the form below and click "save & send". Then check your inbox for an email with your quote details and a link to resume your order at a later time.
									

										If you would like to change your email address, edit it below and click "save & send". Then check your inbox for an email with your quote details and a link to resume your order at a later time.
									















Please Select Country
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua And Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard And Mc Donald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea, Republic of
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova, Republic Of
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
Neutral Zone
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Reunion
Romania
Saint Kitts And Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Vincent And The Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome And Principe
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
St. Helena
St. Pierre And Miquelon
Suriname
Svalbard And Jan Mayen Islands
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Tanzania, United Republic Of
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad And Tobago
Tunisia
Turks And Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Vatican City State (Holy See)
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands (British)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Wallis And Futuna Islands
Western Sahara
Zaire
Zambia












											By providing your telephone number(s) and clicking save and send, you expressly authorize incorporate.com to contact you at the telephone number(s) above, regarding any order(s) or to introduce marketing offers, using automated telephone dialing systems. You are not required to provide this consent in order to purchase goods or services.
										



Close
Save & Send





Close
start new order











































Starting a Business - Forming an LLC or Corporation  | incorporate.com

































































                        






    
    	877.583.4570
    
	


                    

                        






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                    




Starting a Business


Getting Started


Incorporate Now


Business Startup Wizard


Limited Liability Company(LLC)


S Corporation


C Corporation


Comparison Chart


Business Licenses


Employer ID Number (EIN)


Learn More


Benefits of Incorporating


Start-up Tasks


Corporation vs LLC


Bylaws & Operating Agreements


State Guides


eBooks


Business Coaching


Annual Report


Contact Us











Take that first step.
Starting a business can be scary, but knowing what you need to make it happen makes things easier.
Getting Started





Business Formation Wizard






Not Sure Whether Incorporating or Forming an LLC is Right for You? Want to find out what others in your industry are doing? Let our wizard help. More…







Business Entity Types






To get the most out of your small business, choose the right structure. Selecting the right type of company for your new business helps maximize your chances of financial and operational success. More…







Employer Identification Number (EIN)






Corporations, most LLCs, and all businesses with employees must have this IRS-issued identifier. Much like a Social Security Number, an Employer Identification Number (EIN) is a federal nine-digit number that identifies a business entity. More…







Business Licenses & Permits






Most state, county, and local governments require companies to have the right licenses and permits in place before they open their doors. More…







Name Reservations






A name reservation lets you hold a particular business name for later use and prevents other companies from registering that name without notice to you. Get a free corporate name check today. More…







Register a Business Name






Many state and local governments require companies to register any alternate names under which they conduct business. Registering a DBA name alerts the public that your business intends to use that name. More…







Registered Agent Service






Corporations and Limited Liability Companies (LLCs) are required by state law to have an address where they can receive important legal and tax documents during all business hours. The person or firm receiving these documents is known as the company's "Registered Agent." More…




Business Entities





Limited Liability Company (LLC)






An LLC is a great choice for businesses that want the liability protection of a corporation with less paperwork. More…







C Corporation






A C Corporation is the most common business entity. An ideal choice for businesses that want to attract investors. More…







S Corporation






An S Corporation is a great choice for small businesses that want to avoid double taxation on business profits. More…







Nonprofit Corporation






A Non Profit business structure is the right choice for scientific, religious, educational or charitable endeavors. More…







Professional Corporation






Some states allow Professional LLCs for licensed professionals, including doctors, accountants, lawyers, engineers, architects and realtors. More…







Series LLC






A Series LLCs permits multiple members, managers and business lines. Allowed in some states. More…







Limited Partnership






A Limited Partnership provides some protection from liability for certain partners. More…




No Dumb Questions
Get your questions answered and learn more about starting your business by calling 800.818.6082.












Let's get to it.



Where are you incorporating?
AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




How are you incorporating?
LLC
S Corporation
C Corporation
Non-Profit Corporation


get started














Learn
Startup Wizard
Incorporate 101
Forming an LLC
LLC vs. Corporation
Business Licenses
Business Coaching




About Us
Our Story
Contact
Site Map




Events & Programs
International
Webinars
Affiliate Program











incorporate-logo-white-tcc

















































No dumb questions.
          We know there's a lot to consider when incorporating. That's why our business experts are here to help from 





8 a.m. to 8 p.m. ET, Monday through Thursday, and 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. ET, Friday. Call 
          
              
              
                  
                      






    
    	866.514.1346
    
	


                  

                      






    
    	800.818.6082
    
	


                  


contact us



























©  incorporate.com. All rights reserved. Privacy | Legal
incorporate.com is a service company and does not offer legal or financial advice.









LOADING




























